Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1560.04
Litter fee; taxable and nontaxable sales; calculation.

In lieu of requiring each license holder to separately account for taxable and nontaxable sales under sections 81-1560.01 and 81-1560.02, the Tax Commissioner shall provide by rule and regulation that the tax imposed under section 81-1560.01 may be reported and paid based on a percentage of the sales for a particular type of business if the Tax Commissioner determines that the percentage reasonably approximates the taxable activity of the particular type of business.

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 16.
September 30, 2025